California statutes. Education Code
The governing board of any community college district, within 10 working days of date of employment, shall require each person to be employed, or employed in, a nonacademic position to have two 8″× 8″ fingerprint cards bearing the legible rolled and flat impressions of that person’s fingerprints together with a personal description of the applicant or employee, as the case may be, prepared by a local public law enforcement agency having jurisdiction in the area of the district, which agency shall transmit the cards, together with the fee hereinafter specified, to the Department of Justice; except that a district, or districts with a common board, having a full-time equivalent student of 60,000 or more may process the fingerprint cards if the district so elects. “Local public law enforcement agency,” as used in this section and in Section 88025, includes a community college district with full-time equivalent students of 60,000 or more. Upon receiving the identification cards, the Department of Justice shall ascertain whether the applicant or employee has been arrested or convicted of any crime insofar as that fact can be ascertained from information available to the department and shall forward that information to the local public law enforcement agency submitting the applicant’s or employee’s fingerprints at the earliest possible date. The Department of Justice may forward one copy of the fingerprint cards submitted to any other bureau of investigation it may deem necessary in order to verify any record of previous arrests or convictions of the applicant or employee.

The governing board of each district shall forward a request to the Department of Justice indicating the number of current employees who have not completed the requirements of this section. The Department of Justice shall direct when the cards are to be forwarded to it for processing. Districts that previously have submitted identification cards for current employees to either the Department of Justice or the Federal Bureau of Investigation shall not be required to further implement the provisions of this section as it applies to those employees.

A plea or verdict of guilty, or a finding of guilt by a court in a trial without a jury or forfeiture of bail, is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this section, irrespective of a subsequent order under Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing the withdrawal of the plea of guilty and entering of a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusations or information.

The governing board shall provide the means whereby the identification cards may be completed and shall charge a fee determined by the Department of Justice to be sufficient to reimburse the department for the costs incurred in processing the application. The amount of the fee shall be forwarded to the Department of Justice with two copies of applicant’s or employee’s fingerprint cards. The governing board may collect an additional fee not to exceed two dollars ($2) payable to the local public law enforcement agency taking the fingerprints and completing the data on the fingerprint cards. The additional fees shall be transmitted to the city or county treasury. If an applicant is subsequently hired by the board within 30 days of the application, the fee may be reimbursed to the applicant. Funds not reimbursed to applicants shall be credited to the general fund of the district. If the fingerprint cards forwarded to the Department of Justice are those of a person already in the employ of the governing board, the district shall pay the fee required by this section, which fee shall be a proper charge against the general fund of the district, and no fee shall be charged the employee.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, substitute and temporary employees, employed for less than a school year, may be exempted from these provisions. This section shall not apply to a district, or districts with a common board, that has an average daily attendance of 400,000 or greater, or to a community college district wholly within a city and county, unless the governing board of the district or districts, by rule, provides for adherence to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 196.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88025.

Any provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, the Department of Justice, shall, as provided in Section 88024, furnish, upon application of a local public law enforcement agency all information pertaining to any such person of whom there is a record in its office.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88026.

The workweek of a classified employee, as defined in Section 88033 or Section 88076, shall be 40 hours. The workday shall be eight hours. These provisions do not restrict the extention of a regular workday or workweek on an overtime basis when such is necessary to carry on the business of the district. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to bar the district from establishing a workday of less than eight hours or a workweek of less than 40 hours for all or any of its classified positions.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section and Section 88027, a governing board may, with the approval of the personnel commission, where applicable, exempt specific classes of positions from compensation for overtime in excess of eight hours in one day, provided that hours worked in excess of 40 in a calendar week shall be compensated on an overtime basis. Such exemption shall be applied only to those classes which the governing board and personnel commission, where applicable, specifically find to be subject to fluctuations in daily working hours not susceptible to administrative control, such as security patrol and recreation classes, but shall not include food-service and transportation classes.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88027.

The governing board of each community college district shall provide the extent to which, and establish the method by which ordered overtime is compensated. The board shall provide for such compensation or compensatory time off at a rate at least equal to time and one-half the regular rate of pay of the employee designated and authorized to perform the overtime.

Overtime is defined to include any time required to be worked in excess of eight hours in any one day and in excess of 40 hours in any calendar week. If a governing board establishes a workday of less than eight hours but seven hours or more and a workweek of less than 40 hours but 35 hours or more for all of its classified positions or for certain classes of classified positions, all time worked in excess of the established workday and workweek shall be deemed to be overtime. The foregoing provisions do not apply to classified positions for which a workday of fewer than seven hours and a workweek of fewer than 35 hours has been established, nor to positions for which a workday of eight hours and a workweek of 40 hours has been established, but in which positions employees are temporarily assigned to work fewer than eight hours per day or 40 hours per week when such reduction in hours is necessary to avoid layoffs for lack of work or lack of funds and the consent of the majority of affected employees to such reduction in hours has been first obtained.

For the purpose of computing the number of hours worked, time during which an employee is excused from work because of holidays, sick leave, vacation, compensating time off, or other paid leave of absence shall be considered as time worked by the employee.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88028.

When compensatory time off is authorized in lieu of cash compensation, such compensatory time off shall be granted within 12 calendar months following the month in which the overtime was worked and without impairing the services rendered by the employing district.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88029.

Notwithstanding Sections 88026 and 88027, a personnel commission, when applicable, or a governing board of a community college district, may specify certain positions or classes of positions as supervisory, administrative, or executive and exclude the employees serving in those positions and the positions from the overtime provisions.

To be excluded from the overtime provisions, the positions or classes of positions must clearly and reasonably be management positions. In approving positions or classes of positions for exclusion from the overtime provisions, the personnel commission, when applicable, or the governing board of a district, shall certify, in writing, that the duties, flexibility of hours, salary, benefit structure, and authority of the positions or classes of positions are of such a nature that they should be set apart from those positions that are subject to the overtime provisions, and that employees serving in the excluded positions or classes of positions will not be unreasonably discriminated against as a result of the exclusion.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, if a person serving in an excluded position is required to work on a holiday, as provided for in this code, or by action of a governing board, he or she shall be paid, in addition to his or her regular pay for the holiday, compensation, or given compensating time off, at a rate not less than his or her normal rate of pay.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 139, Sec. 2.   Effective July 19, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

88030.

Notwithstanding Section 88026, the workweek shall consist of not more than five consecutive working days for any employee having an average workday of four hours or more during the workweek. Such an employee shall be compensated for any work required to be performed on the sixth or seventh day following the commencement of the workweek at a rate equal to 112 times the regular rate of pay of the employee designated and authorized to perform the work.

An employee having an average workday of less than four hours during a workweek shall, for any work required to be performed on the seventh day following the commencement of his or her workweek, be compensated for at a rate equal to 112 times the regular rate of pay of the employee designated and authorized to perform the work.

Positions and employees excluded from overtime compensation pursuant to Section 88029 shall likewise be excluded from this section.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 197.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88033.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, no minimum or maximum age limits shall be established for the employment or continuance in employment of persons as part of the classified service.

(b) Any person possessing all of the minimum qualifications for any employment shall be eligible for appointment to that employment, and no rule or policy, either written or unwritten, heretofore or hereafter adopted, shall prohibit the employment or continued employment, solely because of the age of any such person in any community college employment who is otherwise qualified therefor.

(c) No person shall be employed in community college employment while he or she is receiving a retirement allowance under any retirement system by reason of prior school or community college employment, except as provided in Article 5 (commencing with Section 21150) of Chapter 8 of Part 3 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(d) Subdivision (c) shall be inapplicable to persons who were employed in the classified service of any community college district as of September 18, 1959, and who are still employed by the same district on September 15, 1961, and the rights of those persons shall be fixed and determined as of September 18, 1959, and none of these persons shall be deprived of any right to any retirement allowance or eligibility for any such allowance to which he or she would have been entitled as of that date. Any such person who, by reason of any provision of law to the contrary, has been deprived of any right to retirement allowance or eligibility for such an allowance, shall, upon the filing of application therefor, be reinstated to those rights as he or she would have had, had this subdivision been in effect on September 18, 1959.

(e) This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 83.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

88034.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (c) of Section 88033, a retired classified school employee may be employed by a community college district, but only in accordance with the provisions of Article 5 (commencing with Section 21150) of Chapter 8 of Part 3 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88035.

All probationary and permanent part-time classified employees shall be entitled to sick leave, and all other benefits conferred by law on classified employees. Part-time employees shall be entitled to all leaves and benefits granted by the governing board to a majority of the regular full-time employees in the classified service of the district or to regular full-time employees in the same classified positions or general class of positions; but such leaves and benefits may be prorated in the same ratio as the regular work hours per day, days per week, weeks per month, or months per year of such part-time employees bear to eight hours per day, 40 hours per calendar week, four calendar weeks per month, or 12 calendar months during the school year.

Except for prorating benefits for part-time employees as herein authorized, the governing board shall provide at least the same benefits for all regular employees in the classified service as it provides for the majority of such employees.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the granting of additional benefits for some employees in recognition of nature of work, level of classification, or length of service.

This section shall not apply to employees properly designated as substitute, short-term, or limited-term employees, as defined in Sections 88003 and 88105, unless such employees are specifically included by a governing board, or by a personnel commission for those districts included under the provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of this chapter.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of this chapter.

This section shall not apply to those benefits authorized under the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 53200) of Chapter 2 of Part 1, of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88036.

A classified employee who works a minimum of 30 minutes per day in excess of his or her part-time assignment for a period of 20 consecutive working days or more shall have his or her basic assignment changed to reflect the longer hours in order to acquire fringe benefits on a properly prorated basis as specified in Section 88035.

If a part-time employee’s average paid time, excluding overtime for which the employee receives compensation at a rate at least equal to time and one-half, exceeds his or her average assigned time by 50 minutes or more per working day in any quarter, the hours paid per day for compensable leaves of absence and holidays in the succeeding quarter shall be equivalent to the average hours paid per working day in the preceding quarter, excluding overtime.

Except where vacation entitlement is accrued on the basis of actual hours of paid regular service, vacation entitlement shall be based on the average number of hours worked per working day during the portion of the college year in which the employee is assigned to duty.

It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this section, to ensure that part-time employees are accorded fringe benefits on an appropriate prorated basis with full recognition given to the number of hours worked by the part-time employee, rather than on the basis of time fixed to the position when the fixed time is not reasonably correlated with the actual time worked. This section is to be liberally construed in order that Section 88035 may not be circumvented by requiring employees to work in excess of the regularly fixed hours for a position on an overtime basis, but for which premium pay is not provided nor appropriate adjustment is not made in fringe benefit entitlement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 201.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88037.

The governing board of any community college district may require the wearing of a distinctive uniform by classified personnel. The cost of the purchase, lease or rental of uniforms, equipment, identification badges, emblems, and cards required by the district shall be borne by the district.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88038.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, the governing board of a community college district may establish regulations which allow their classified employees to reduce their workload from full-time to part-time duties.

The regulations shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following, if classified employees wish to reduce their workload and maintain retirement benefits pursuant to Section 20819 of the Government Code:

(a) The classified employee shall have reached the age of 55 prior to reduction in workload.

(b) The classified employee shall have been employed full time in a classified position for at least 10 years of which the immediately preceding five years were full-time employment.

(c) During the period immediately preceding a request for a reduction in workload, the classified employee shall have been employed full time in a classified position for a total of at least five years without a break in service.

(d) The option of part-time employment shall be exercised at the request of the classified employee and can be revoked only with the mutual consent of the employer and the classified employee.

(e) The classified employee shall be paid a salary which is the pro rata share of the salary he or she would be earning had he or she not elected to exercise the option of part-time employment but shall retain all other rights and benefits for which he or she makes the payments that would be required if he or she remained in full-time classified employment.

The classified employee shall receive health benefits as provided in Section 53201 of the Government Code in the same manner as a full-time classified employee.

(f) The minimum part-time employment shall be the equivalent of one-half of the number of days of service required by the classified employee’s contract of employment during his or her final year of service in a full-time classified position.

(g) The period of the part-time classified employment shall not exceed five years.

(h) The period of the part-time classified employment shall not extend beyond the end of the school year during which the classified employee reaches his or her 70th birthday.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 658, Sec. 2.   Effective September 12, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

88040.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 88026, the governing board of a community college district may establish the workday and workweek schedules of classified employees with the concurrence of the employee organization, or in the absence of an employee organization, the concurrence of the affected employee. 

(2) Notwithstanding Section 88027, if the governing board of a community college district establishes a workday or workweek schedule, or both, pursuant to this section, the overtime rate shall be paid for all hours worked in excess of the required workday or a workweek of 40 hours.

(b) This section applies to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 476, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Inclusion in the Merit System [88050. - 88057.]

88050.

As used in this article, “a district whose full-time equivalent student is 3,000 or greater” shall be construed to include any district which is the only district in the territory under the jurisdiction of the county superintendent of schools regardless of its full-time equivalent student.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 202.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88051.

(a) (1) On or after November 8, 1967, the classified employees of a community college district whose full-time equivalent student is 3,000 or greater, in accordance with this article, may petition the governing board of the community college district to make Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) applicable to the community college district. That petition shall read substantially as follows:

“We, the undersigned classified employees of the _____ (name of community college district), constituting 15 percent or more of the classified personnel entitled to vote, request the governing board to submit to election the
 question of whether or not the merit (civil service) system shall become applicable to this district.NAME 
POSITION CLASSIFICATION ”(2) “Classified employee,” as used in this section, shall be construed to include all personnel who are a part of the classified service, as defined in Section 88003.

(b) Within 120 days after receipt of the petition the governing
 board of the community college district shall do all of the following:

(1) Obtain the services of competent and qualified persons to present the pros and cons of the issue. Notwithstanding this paragraph, the classified employees who submitted the petition may select the person or persons to present the proponent position on the issue.

(2) Provide adequate and ample opportunity for all of its classified personnel to attend one or more meetings at which the issue is presented.

(3) (A) Having complied with paragraphs (1) and (2), conduct an election by secret ballot of its classified personnel to determine whether or not they desire to make the merit system applicable to the community college district. The ballot shall read:“Shall the merit (civil service) system for classified employees be applicable in the ____________ (name of community college district)?☐ Yes☐ No”(B) Although the ballot shall not require the employees’ signatures or other personal identifying requirements, the governing board of the community college district shall devise an identification system to ensure against fraud in the balloting process while also ensuring ballot secrecy.

(c) (1) The governing board of the community college district shall appoint a three- or five-person tabulation committee, at least one
 member of which shall be a member of the governing board of the community college district and at least one member of which shall be a classified employee designated by the largest exclusive representative of classified employees within the community college district, to canvass the ballots and present the results to the governing board of the community college district. No representative of the community college district shall make any marks upon the ballot envelope or ballot of any employee, except that the tabulation committee may adopt a system of uniformly stamping in a consistent manner and in the same location on all ballots received or all ballots counted, or both of those, to help ensure an accurate count. If a simple majority votes in favor of the merit system, that system shall become applicable in the community college district.

(2) The tabulation committee shall certify the results of the election to the governing board of the
 community college district at the next regular or special meeting of the governing board of the community college district following the date the committee completes tabulation of the votes. If the tabulation committee completes the tabulation on the same day that the governing board of the community college district meets in regular or special session, the committee shall certify the results of the election to the governing board of the community college district at that meeting.

(d) If the community college district communicates with classified employees in opposition to adopting the merit (civil service) system, it shall provide at least equal time and equal access to any exclusive representative of classified employees within the community college district to communicate in favor of that system. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as limiting the rights of an exclusive representative under the Educational Employment Relations Act
 (Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code) for access to communicate its position on adopting the system.

(e) All election procedures not specified above for an election pursuant to this section shall be within the scope of representation of an exclusive representative under Section 3543.2 of the Government Code, including the rules for campaigning, the election date, time, and place, translation of the ballot, electioneering near the polls, and balloting methods.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 88, Sec. 3.   (AB 289)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

88052.

Effective upon certification to a governing board by a tabulating committee that an election, as authorized in Section 88051 of this code, has been successful, all of the provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) that can reasonably be construed to be applicable to classified employees shall be applicable.

All of the provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) shall become fully effective upon appointment of at least two members of the personnel commission.

The commission shall immediately adopt existing rules and regulations of the district relating to classified
 personnel pending the establishment of its rules and which are not inconsistent with law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88053.

The governing board of a community college district whose full-time equivalent student is less than 3,000, by affirmative vote of a majority of its members, may adopt the procedure set forth in Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060). The motion or a resolution for adoption of the system shall specify the date that Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) shall be applicable to the classified employees of the district, which shall not be later than July 1 next following the date of adoption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 204.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88054.

The governing board of a community college district whose full-time equivalent student is 3,000 or more, by affirmative vote of a majority of its members, may adopt the procedure set forth in Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060), if a lawful petition has not been received as authorized in Section 88051, or may adopt the procedure at any time after a two-year period has elapsed following an unsuccessful election conducted in accordance with Section 88051.

The motion, order, or resolution for adoption of the procedure
 shall specify the date that Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) shall be applicable to classified employees, which shall not be later than July 1 next following the date of adoption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 205.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88055.

When an election has been held, as authorized in this article, and fails to receive a simple majority affirmative vote, the classified employees of that district may not again petition for an election until at least two years has elapsed since the last election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88056.

Any person who intimidates, coerces, or discriminates in any way against any classified employee for the doing of any act authorized herein shall be personally liable to such employee for all damages suffered thereby and such exemplary damages as the court may allow.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88057.

The procedure set forth in Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) may also be adopted by a majority of the voting electors of the community college districts assenting to the plan after it has been placed on the ballot upon the written petition of qualified electors not less in number than 10 percent of the number voting in the last election for a member of the governing board. The question of adoption shall be placed on the ballot at the next regular governing board member election, or the next primary or general election in a general election year, whichever
 is earlier, after receipt of the petition by the registrar of voters.

The ballot measure shall specify the date that Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) shall be applicable to classified employees, which shall not be later than July 1 next following the date of adoption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 206.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Merit System [88060. - 88139.]

88060.

Any community college district adopting the provisions of this article in accordance with Section 88052 or 88057 of this chapter shall cause the personnel commission to be appointed in the manner prescribed in Sections 88065, 88066 and 88067. The personnel commission shall appoint the personnel director in the manner provided in Section 88084 after appointment of at least two of its members.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88061.

In any district in which the procedure set forth in this article has been incorporated the governing board shall employ, pay, and otherwise control the services of persons in nonacademic positions in accordance with the provisions of this article.

No governing board shall remove a position from the classified service by title assignment or otherwise unless the position is one for which minimum qualifications have been established by the board of governors pursuant to Section 87356.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 185.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

88063.

In any district that has adopted the provisions of this article there shall be appointed a personnel commission composed of either three or five members. The governing board of any community college district, by a majority vote, and with the agreement of the existing personnel commission of the district, if that commission is in existence, may elect to increase the membership of the personnel commission from three to five members or to decrease the membership from five to three members. If two or more districts are under the jurisdiction of governing boards of identical personnel, only one commission shall be appointed. In those cases this article shall apply alike to all of the districts, and the expenses of the commission shall be paid out of the general funds of all of the districts in proportion to the benefits derived therefrom as determined by the governing board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1296, Sec. 34.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

88063.5.

Notwithstanding Section 88063 or any other provision of law, in the case of a community college district that was formerly under the jurisdiction of governing boards of identical personnel for both the community college district and a unified district and that had a majority of its population within an incorporated city which had a population between 70,000 and 75,000 as of the 1950 census, and where the governing board, by affirmative vote of the majority of its members, made this article applicable to each of the districts individually and separately, the rights of persons employed in nonacademic positions shall continue in the same manner as if the separation had not occurred, except that the rights shall be limited to the district in which the person is employed on the day the action was taken by the governing board. For purposes of determining seniority, employment shall be deemed to have commenced as of the date of original employment in either the unified district or the community college district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 207.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88064.

(a) To be eligible for appointment or reappointment to the commission, a person shall meet both of the following requirements:

(1) Be a registered voter and resident within the territorial jurisdiction of the community college district.

(2) Be a known adherent to the principle of the merit system.

(b) No member of the governing board of any community college district or a county board of education shall be eligible for appointment, reappointment, or continuance as a member of the commission. During his or her term of service, a member of the commission shall not be an employee of the district.

(c) As used in this section, “known adherent to the principle of the merit system,” with respect to a new appointee, shall mean a person who by the nature of his or her prior public or private service has given evidence that he or she supports the concept of employment, continuance in employment, in-service promotional opportunities, and other related matters on the basis of merit and fitness. As used in this section, “known adherent to the principle of the merit system,” with respect to a candidate for reappointment, shall mean a commissioner who has clearly demonstrated through meeting attendance and actions that he or she does, in fact, support the merit system and its operation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 954, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

88065.

One member of the commission shall be appointed by the governing board of the district and one member, nominated by the classified employees of the district, shall be appointed by the governing board of the district. Those two members shall, in turn, appoint the third member.

As used in this section, “classified employees” shall mean an exclusive representative which represents the largest number of classified employees in a unit or units within the district. If there is no such exclusive representative within the district the governing board shall, by written rule, prescribe the method by which the recommendation is to be made by its classified employees. 

In any community college district which has a five-member personnel commission, two members of the commission shall be appointed by the governing board of the district and two members, nominated by the classified employees of the district, shall be appointed by the governing board of the district. Those four members of the personnel commission shall, in turn, appoint the fifth member to the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 187.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

88066.

(a) Within 30 days after adoption of the system the governing board shall publicly announce its intended appointee, and the appointee or appointees, as appropriate, nominated by its classified employees. As soon after their appointment as practicable but within 30 days, the appointed members shall announce their intended appointee for the third or fifth member, as appropriate. They may consider the recommendations of the governing board, the classified employees, or other concerned citizens. If these members do not announce their intended appointee within the 30-day period, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall make the appointment.

“Adoption of the system” means, in the case of Section 88051, the day on which a successful election is certified to the governing board or, in the case of Section 88054, the day the governing board approves a motion, order, or resolution to adopt the system regardless of the date specified for operational commencement of the system.

(b) Where a system is already in existence and a vacancy will exist on December 1, by not later than September 30:

(1) The governing board shall publicly announce the name of the person it intends to appoint or reappoint, if the vacancy is its appointee.

(2) The appointee or appointees, as appropriate, of the governing board and the appointee or appointees of the classified employees shall publicly announce the name of the person they intend to appoint, if the vacancy is their appointee. 

If the governing board and the classified employees of the district are unable to agree upon a nomination by September 30, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall make the appointment within 30 days.

(c) Where a system is already in existence and a vacancy in a position nominated by the classified employees will occur, the classified employees shall submit the name of its nominee to the governing board at least 30 days prior to the date on which the vacancy will occur and the governing board shall appoint that nominee to be effective on the date on which the vacancy would occur.

(d) At a board meeting to be held after 30 and within 45 days of the dates specified in subdivision (a) and paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), as the case may be, the governing board in open hearing shall provide the public and employees and employee organizations the opportunity to express their views on the qualifications of those persons recommended by the governing board for appointment.
